Massachusetts, session 194th, H2205.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, primary care
physicians shall be eligible for the loan repayment assistance program established in item 1599-
2026 of chapter 102 of the Acts of 2021, provided that primary care physicians shall include, but
not be limited to, family physicians, internal medicine physicians, pediatricians, obstetricians and
gynecologists; and provided further, that to be eligible for loan forgiveness, primary care
physicians shall:
(a) work in a practice setting with a significant public payor patient population as
determined by the department of public health;
(b) have outstanding educational debt;
(c) not participate in any other loan repayment program; and
of 2

(d) be required to enter into a contract with the commonwealth for not less than 4 years;
provided further, that the amounts of assistance per individual shall be pro-rated for individuals
working on a part-time basis.
SECTION 2. The executive office of health and human services shall promulgate
regulations to implement the provisions of section 1 of this act no later than 3 months after the
effective date of this act.
of 2